Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.145

Registered voter.

"Registered voter" means any elector who has completed the statutory registration procedures established by this title. The terms "registered voter" and "qualified elector" are synonymous.

[ 2003 c 111 s 125; 1987 c 346 s 7. Formerly RCW 29.01.137.]

NOTES:

Legislative intent—Effective date—1987 c 346: See notes following RCW 29A.40.010.